Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2626.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2(4) of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, is amended by adding a subclause and the section is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 2. Definitions.--As used in this act.* * *(4) "Unfair methods of competition" and "unfair or deceptive acts or practices" mean any one or more of the following:* * *(xx.1) Using dynamic pricing to offer or set a price for a good or service in a retail store physically located within this 12345678910111213141516171819 Commonwealth if that price is displayed electronically in a manner which enables a person or automated system to remotely change the price displayed using dynamic pricing.* * *(14) "Dynamic pricing" means pricing that fluctuates dependent on conditions where models retrain or recalibrate on information in near real time, excluding promotional pricing offers, loyalty program benefits or other temporary discounts or changes to pricing related to retention of existing customers.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2626PN3590 - 2 - 12345678910